Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,158.06
Mobile nail technology salon license; revocation or expiration; effect.

The license of a mobile nail technology salon that has been revoked or expired for any reason shall not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such salon may reopen for business.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 63.